FST/turkish.lexc
!!!turkish.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Acc

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

kitap   Ninf;
kağıt  Ninf;
ağaç   Ninf;
pabuç Ninf;
kap   Ninf;
kütük Ninf;
köpek Ninf;
dolap Ninf;
çocuk Ninf;
senet Ninf;
tüfek Ninf;
piliç Ninf;
hesap Ninf;
bebek Ninf;
ilaç Ninf;
çubuk Ninf;
bayrak Ninf;
balık Ninf;
kilit Ninf;
mezhep Ninf;

kalem Ninf;
defter Ninf;
ses Ninf;
telefon Ninf;
televizyon Ninf;
bilgisayar Ninf;
okul Ninf;
sınıf Ninf;
köy Ninf;
tüy Ninf;
komodin Ninf;
fermuar Ninf;
demir Ninf;
ses Ninf;
ev Ninf;
zil Ninf;
gırgır Ninf;
çarşaf Ninf;
kaplan Ninf;
pantolon Ninf;


LEXICON Ninf

+N:0   #;
+N+Acc:^i  #;
